Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 9 Boundary Line Determination

34-9-1.
Petition for determination of boundaries covered by tidewater.

Any person having any interest in land bordering on public tidewater, whenever a harbor line shall have been confirmed and established in front of or adjacent to the land, may apply by petition to the supreme court for the settlement and determination of the lines and boundaries of his interest and of the interests of all others in the land covered by public tidewater within such harbor line.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 266, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1166; G.L. 1909, ch. 331, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 382, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 593, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-9-1

.

34-9-2.
Appointment of commissioners — Report — Recording.

Upon such petition the court may appoint three (3) commissioners to make a survey of the land within and adjacent to the harbor line, covering the area of land as the commissioners may deem necessary, to include the interests of all persons whose rights may be affected by the determination of the lines; and the commissioners, being first sworn to a faithful discharge of their duties, shall determine the boundary lines of the interests of all the persons whose rights may be affected by the determination of the lines, and shall report to the court the boundaries so established, with a plat of the land, within and adjacent to the harbor line, showing the lines established for each person having an interest therein, which plat, after its approval by the court, shall by order of the court be recorded in the records of land evidence in the town where such land lies and in the office of the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 266, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 331, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 382, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 593, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-9-2

.

34-9-3.
Notice and hearing by commissioners — Effect of report.

Before proceeding to make a survey and to establish the lines according to §

34-9-2

, the commissioners shall notify all persons whose rights may be affected by the determination of the lines, in the manner as the court shall direct, to appear at a time and place named to be heard in relation to the survey. The report and plan of the commissioners, when approved by the court and recorded as provided in §

34-9-2

, shall forever fix and determine the rights of all persons and parties, except when definite boundary lines have been established by parties legally authorized so to do.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 266, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 331, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 382, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 593, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-9-3

.

34-9-4.
[Obsolete.]

34-9-5.
Expense of proceedings.

The just charges and expenses of the commissioners shall be ascertained and allowed by the court; any further costs of the proceedings shall be taxed in the usual manner; and all the costs and expenses shall be apportioned by the court upon all parties interested as aforesaid, in such proportions or amounts as the court shall deem equitable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 266, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 331, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 382, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 593, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-9-5

.

34-9-6.
Persons acquiring title during proceedings.

Any person who shall acquire, during the pendency of such proceedings, an interest in, or title to, any lands covered by public tidewater within such harbor line, which are the subject matter of such proceedings, may, by order of the court, be made a party to such proceedings, and chargeable with a share of the costs and expenses thereof, in such manner and to such extent as the court may prescribe.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 266, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 331, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 382, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 593, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-9-6

.

34-9-7.
State interest unaffected.

No proceedings under the provisions of this chapter shall affect any right or title of the state to any lands, unless it consents to become a party to the proceedings.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 266, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 331, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 382, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 593, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-9-7

.